Utah statutes.
10-3-1103.   Sickness, disability and death benefits.
(1)  The governing body of each municipality may maintain as to all elective
or appointive officers and employees, including heads of departments, a system
for the payment of health, dental, hospital, medical, disability and death
benefits to be financed and administered in a manner and payable upon the
terms and conditions as the governing body of the municipality may by
ordinance or resolution prescribe.
(2)  The governing bodies of the municipalities may create and administer
personnel benefit programs separately or jointly with other municipalities or
other political subdivisions of the State of Utah or associations thereof.
